Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3501
Act, how cited.

Sections 25-3501 to 25-3508 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Civil Remedies for Unauthorized Disclosure of Intimate Images Act.

Laws 2019, LB680, § 1.